Massachusetts, session 194th, H3907.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 16A of chapter 51 of the general laws, the city 
charter, or any general or special law to the contrary, there is hereby established in the city of 
Salem a board of election commissioners, hereinafter called the board. The board shall have all 
the powers, rights, duties and liabilities under general and special laws of boards of registrars of 
voters, and, with respect to elections, of the city clerk. The board shall consist of five persons, 
and appointments thereto shall be made so that no less than two members of the board represent 
each of the two leading political parties as defined in section one of chapter fifty of the general 
laws. The fifth member of the board may be unenrolled. Board representation shall, to the extent 
feasible, represent the racial and ethnic make-up of the city of Salem. The members shall receive 
such compensation as the mayor and city council may determine. 
SECTION 2. The board shall organize annually in the month of January and choose a 
chairperson, vice chairperson and a secretary. In case the members are unable to agree upon a 

of 4 13 chairperson, vice chairperson and a secretary, such officers shall be designated by the mayor. 
The secretary shall keep a full and accurate record of the proceedings of the board and shall 
perform such other duties as the board may require. The chairperson shall act as an 
ombudsperson charged with representing the interests of the public by investigating any 
complaints of maladministration or violation of rights in the voting process. All the powers, 
rights, privileges, liabilities and duties relating to caucuses, primaries and elections by law vested 
in and imposed upon city clerks and board of registrars of voters, except the power and duty of 
giving notice of elections and fixing the days and hours of holding the same, shall be vested in 
and performed by the board of election commissioners. The board shall also promote voter 
registration and participation in the electoral process. 
SECTION 3. To assist the board, the mayor may, subject to appropriation, appoint 
assistant commissioners from one or more candidates recommended by the board, which 
commissioners shall have such powers as granted to assistant registrars of voters by chapter 51 
of the general laws, and shall perform such duties as are requested by the board. The board may 
also appoint an administrative director of the board of election commissioners, with confirmation 
from the mayor, subject to appropriation, who in that capacity shall: (1) provide administrative 
and operational support to the board of election commissioners (2) perform such duties and 
responsibilities as may be required or requested by the board of election commissioners in the 
performance of its duties under the Massachusetts general law or regulation or as otherwise 
prescribed to said board by any federal, general or special law; (3) coordinate the services of 
other city departments for the conduct of any election; and, (4) administer and keep the records 
of the board of election commissioners. 

of 4 35  SECTION 4. Chapter 445 of the Acts of 1960 is hereby amended by deleting in section 3 
the words, “board of registrars of voters” and inserting in place thereof the words:- board of 
election commissioners. 
SECTION 5. Said Chapter 445 is hereby further amended by deleting in section 4 the 
words, “board of registrars” and inserting in place thereof the words:- board of election 
commissioners. 
SECTION 6. On the effective date of this act, the office of board of registrars shall be 
abolished and the terms of the incumbent members of the board of registrars terminated; 
provided, however, that the incumbent members of the board of registrars, other than the city 
clerk, shall become the first members of the board of election commissioners and serve for a 
period equivalent to the remainder of their appointed terms or their earlier vacating of office and 
until their successors are appointed and qualified. The mayor shall forthwith appoint two 
additional members, subject to the confirmation of the city council, of the board of election 
commissioners consistent with the requirement that no less than two members of the board must 
represent each of the two leading political parties as defined in section one of chapter fifty of the 
general laws. One of the additional members shall serve for a period of two years and the second 
additional member shall serve for a period of three years so that no more than two board 
members’ terms of appointment expire in the same calendar year. Following the initial 
appointment of the additional members, each member shall serve for a period of three years. Any 
vacancy on the board shall be filled in like manner for the remainder of the unexpired term. 
SECTION 7. Immediately upon the effective date of this act, the books, papers, records 
and all other property in the possession of the board of registrars of voters relating to the conduct 

of 4 57 of elections, and all contractual obligations and rights of such board shall pass by operation of 
law to the newly formed board of election commissioners. The board of shall be the lawful 
successor of the board of registrars, and, with respect to elections, the city clerk. 
SECTION 8. This act shall take effect upon its passage, or July 1, 2026, whichever is 
later.